Maryland, session 2025, SB0682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0682*

SENATE BILL 682
Article – Real Property
7–105.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Owner–occupied residential property” means residential property in
which at least one unit is occupied by an individual who:
(i) Has an ownership interest in the property; and
(ii) Uses the property as the individual’s primary residence.
(12) “Residential property” means real property improved by four or fewer
single family dwelling units that are designed principally and are intended for human
habitation.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an action to
foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust on residential property may not be filed until the later
of:
(i) 90 days after a default in a condition on which the mortgage or
deed of trust provides that a sale may be made; or
(ii) 45 days after the notice of intent to foreclose required under
subsection (c) of this section is sent.
(2) (i) The secured party may petition the circuit court for leave to
immediately commence an action to foreclose the mortgage or deed of trust if:
1. The loan secured by the mortgage or deed of trust was
obtained by fraud or deception;
2. No payments have ever been made on the loan secured by
the mortgage or deed of trust;
3. The property subject to the mortgage or deed of trust has
been destroyed;
4. The default occurred after the stay has been lifted in a
bankruptcy proceeding; or
5. The property subject to the mortgage or deed of trust is
property that is vacant and abandoned as provided under § 7–105.18 of this subtitle.
(ii) The court may rule on the petition with or without a hearing.

SENATE BILL 682 3
(iii) If the petition is granted:
1. The action may be filed at any time after a default in a
condition on which the mortgage or deed of trust provides that a sale may be made; and
2. The secured party need not send the written notice of
intent to foreclose required under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) An order to docket or a complaint to foreclose a mortgage or deed of trust on
residential property shall:
(1) Include:
(i) If applicable, the license number of:
1. The mortgage originator; and
2. The mortgage lender; and
(ii) An affidavit stating:
1. The date on which the default occurred and the nature of
the default; [and]
2. A. WHETHER THE DEBT INSTRUMENT
CONSTITUTES A MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE WITHIN THE MEANING OF §
7–105.19 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
B. IF THE DEBT INSTRUMENT IS A MATERIALLY
DELINQUENT MORTGAGE WITHIN THE MEANING OF § 7–105.19 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THAT THE SECURED PARTY HAS SATISFIED ANY REQUIREMENTS FOR INSTITUTING
FORECLOSURE UNDER THAT SECTION; AND
[2.] 3. If applicable, that:
A. A notice of intent to foreclose was sent to the mortgagor or
grantor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section and the date on which the notice
was sent; and
B. At the time the notice of intent to foreclose was sent, the
contents of the notice of intent to foreclose were accurate; and
7–105.19.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 682
(2) “BILLING CYCLE” MEANS:
(I) IF A MORTGAGE REQUIRES PERIODIC PAYMENTS AT
INTERVALS OF 3 MONTHS OR LESS, THE INTERVAL BETWEEN THE DAYS OR DATES OF
REGULAR PERIODIC PAYMENTS REQUIRED BY THE TERMS OF THE MORTGAGE; OR
(II) IF THE MORTGAGE TERMS DO NOT REQUIRE PERIODIC
PAYMENTS OR REQUIRE PERIODIC PAYMENTS ON INTERVALS GREATER THAN 3
MONTHS, EVERY 3 MONTHS.
(3) “LOAN–RELATED CORRESPONDENCE” MEANS WRITTEN
COMMUNICATION FROM A SECURED PARTY TO A MORTGAGOR THAT:
(I) IF THE SECURED PARTY IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE
PERIODIC STATEMENTS UNDER 12 C.F.R. § 1026.41, COMPLIES WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THAT PROVISION; OR
(II) IF THE SECURED PARTY IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE
PERIODIC STATEMENTS UNDER 12 C.F.R. § 1026.41, CONTAINS THE FOLLOWING:
1. THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE
SECURED PARTY;
2. THE CURRENT AMOUNT OF THE OUTSTANDING
PRINCIPAL BALANCE;
3. THE CURRENT INTEREST RATE IN EFFECT;
4. THE AMOUNT CURRENTLY DUE DISAGGREGATED BY
PRINCIPAL, INTEREST, CHARGES, AND FEES; AND
5. THE LENGTH OF ANY PAYMENT DELINQUENCY,
INCLUDING THE DATE OF LAST PAYMENT.
(4) “MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE” MEANS A MORTGAGE ON
WHICH NO PAYMENTS HAVE BEEN MADE BY A PARTY, OTHER THAN THE SECURED
PARTY, IN THE PRECEDING 5 YEARS, EXCLUDING ANY PERIOD OF TIME IN WHICH A
SECURED PARTY COULD NOT INSTITUTE A FORECLOSURE PROCEEDING DUE TO AN
EXECUTIVE ORDER OR OTHER SIMILAR OFFICIAL ACTION RESTRICTING
FORECLOSURE ACTIONS.
(5) “MORTGAGE” MEANS ANY MORTGAGE OR DEED OF TRUST
ENCUMBERING OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.

SENATE BILL 682 5
(6) “MORTGAGOR” MEANS ANY PARTY SIGNING A MORTGAGE AS A
MORTGAGOR OR A DEED OF TRUST AS A GRANTOR.
(7) “OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–105.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(8) “RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–105.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(9) “SECURED PARTY” MEANS AN OWNER, A SERVICER, OR ANY
OTHER PERSON ENTITLED TO ENFORCE A MORTGAGE OR A DEED OF TRUST.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO:
(I) PROHIBIT THE FILING OF A PETITION UNDER §
7–105.1(B)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) PRECLUDE THE COURT FROM GRANTING A PETITION WITH
RESPECT TO A MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE UNDER § 7–105.1(B)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) UNLESS PROHIBITED BY LAW, REGULATION, OR EXECUTIVE
ORDER, A SECURED PARTY SHALL SEND LOAN–RELATED CORRESPONDENCE TO THE
MORTGAGOR OF A MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE IN EACH BILLING CYCLE.
(3) PRIOR TO OCTOBER 1, 2027, A SECURED PARTY MAY ENFORCE A
MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE THROUGH COMMENCEMENT OF A
FORECLOSURE OR JUDICIAL SALE ONLY IF:
(I) AT LEAST ONE PIECE OF LOAN–RELATED
CORRESPONDENCE WAS SENT TO THE MORTGAGOR DURING EACH BILLING CYCLE
FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 24 MONTHS, EXCLUDING ANY PERIOD DURING
WHICH THE SECURED PARTY WAS PROHIBITED BY LAW, REGULATION, OR
EXECUTIVE ORDER FROM SENDING LOAN–RELATED CORRESPONDENCE TO THE
MORTGAGOR; OR
(II) ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF
FINANCIAL REGULATION, THE SECURED PARTY SERVES NOTICE ON THE
MORTGAGOR OF THE MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE AT LEAST 90 DAYS
PRIOR TO COMMENCEMENT.
(4) ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2027, A SECURED PARTY MAY ENFORCE
A MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE THROUGH A FORECLOSURE OR JUDICIAL

SENATE BILL 682
SALE ONLY IF THE SECURED PARTY HAS MET THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 24 CONSECUTIVE
MONTHS.
(5) THE COMMISSIONER OF FINANCIAL REGULATION MAY DEVELOP
THE FORM REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION BY
REGULATION.
(C) (1) IN AN ACTION TO FORECLOSE OR OTHERWISE ENFORCE A
MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE, A MORTGAGOR MAY RAISE A DEFENSE OF
LACHES.
(2) A COURT CONSIDERING A DEFENSE OF LACHES IN AN ACTION TO
FORECLOSE OR OTHERWISE ENFORCE A MATERIALLY DELINQUENT MORTGAGE
MAY:
(I) ATTRIBUTE ANY DELAY IN THE ENFORCEMENT OF THE
MORTGAGE TO THE SECURED PARTY EVEN IF THE SECURED PARTY DID NOT HOLD
AN INTEREST IN THE MORTGAGE AT ALL TIMES DURING THE DELAY IN
ENFORCEMENT; AND
(II) ORDER ANY RELIEF THE COURT CONSIDERS TO BE
APPROPRIATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.